Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 1.5 EXCAVATION REQUIREMENTS
9-1.5-104.4. Penalties - guidance.

A person who violates this article 1.5 is subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars for an initial violation and not more than seventy-five thousand dollars for each subsequent violation within a twelve-month period.

In the performance of its duties regarding any complaint, the safety commission is encouraged to consider training, support services, or other remediation measures that will improve the behavior of the party and further the goals of this article 1.5 to ensure the safety of all participants and Coloradans. The safety commission shall develop guidance for the recommendation of remedial actions that are consistent with the following principles:

Guidance shall be developed to help the review committee in determining whether an alleged violation should be classified as a minor, moderate, or major violation;

Alternatives to fines may be considered, especially for a party that the safety commission has not found to be responsible for a violation in the previous twelve months; and

In considering the appropriate remedial action, the safety commission may consider the number of violations relative to the number of notifications received.

The maximum fines for the three different classifications of violations are as follows:

One
Two
Three
Four

Minor
$250
$500
$1,000
$5,000

Moderate
$1,000
$2,500
$5,000
$25,000

Major
$5,000
$25,000
$50,000
$75,000

The following are not subject to a fine otherwise authorized pursuant to this section:

With regard to an excavation occurring on a ranch or farm, a rancher or a farmer, as defined in section 42-20-108.5, unless the excavation is for a nonagricultural purpose; and

With regard to a failure to notify the notification association or the affected owner or operator and to damage to an underground facility during excavation, a homeowner, rancher, or farmer, as defined in section 42-20-108.5, working on the homeowner's, rancher's, or farmer's property.

Number of violations within the previous twelve months

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1568, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 9-1.5-108.

9-1.5-104.5. Civil penalties - applicability.

Every owner or operator of an underground facility in this state shall join the notification association pursuant to section 9-1.5-105.

Any owner or operator of an underground facility who does not join the notification association in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be liable for a civil penalty of two hundred dollars.

If any underground facility located in the service area of an owner or operator is damaged as a result of such owner or operator's failure to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the court shall impose upon such owner or operator a civil penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars for the first offense and up to twenty-five thousand dollars for each subsequent offense within a twelve-month period after the first offense. Upon a first offense, the owner or operator shall be required by the court to complete an excavation safety training program with the notification association.

If any owner or operator fails to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) on more than three separate occasions within a twelve-month period from the date of the first failure to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), then the civil penalty shall be up to seventy-five thousand dollars.

If any underground facility is damaged as a result of the owner or operator's failure to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) or failure to use reasonable care in the marking of the damaged underground facility, such owner or operator shall be presumably liable for:

Any cost or damage incurred by the excavator as a result of any delay in the excavation project while the underground facility is restored, repaired, or replaced, together with reasonable costs and expenses of suit, including reasonable attorney fees; and

Any injury or damage to persons or property resulting from the damage to the underground facility. Any such owner or operator shall also indemnify and defend the affected excavator against any and all claims or actions, if any, for personal injury, death, property damage, or service interruption resulting from the damage to the underground facility.

Any person who intends to excavate shall notify the notification association pursuant to section 9-1.5-103 prior to commencing any excavation activity. For purposes of this paragraph (a), excavation shall not include an excavation by a rancher or a farmer, as defined in section 42-20-108.5, C.R.S., occurring on a ranch or farm unless such excavation is for a nonagricultural purpose.

Any person, other than a homeowner, rancher, or farmer, as defined in section 42-20-108.5, C.R.S., working on such homeowner's, rancher's, or farmer's property, who fails to notify the notification association or the affected owner or operator pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be liable for a civil penalty in the amount of two hundred dollars.

If any person, other than a homeowner, rancher, or farmer, as defined in section 42-20-108.5, C.R.S., working on such homeowner's, rancher's, or farmer's property, fails to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and damages an underground facility during excavation, such person shall be liable for a civil penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars for the first offense and up to twenty-five thousand dollars for each subsequent offense within a twelve-month period after the first offense. Upon a first offense, such person shall be required to complete an excavation safety training program with the notification association.

If any person fails to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) on more than three separate occasions within a twelve-month period from the date of the first failure to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), then the civil penalty shall be up to seventy-five thousand dollars.

If any person, other than a homeowner, rancher, or farmer, as defined in section 42-20-108.5, C.R.S., working on such homeowner's, rancher's, or farmer's property, fails to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) or fails to exercise reasonable care in excavating or performing routine maintenance and damages an underground facility during such excavation or routine maintenance, such person shall be presumably liable for:

Any cost or damage incurred by the owner or operator in restoring, repairing, or replacing its damaged underground facility, together with reasonable costs and expenses of suit, including reasonable attorney fees; and

Any injury or damage to persons or property resulting from the damage to the underground facility. Any such person shall also indemnify and defend the affected owner or operator against any and all claims or actions, if any, for personal injury, death, property damage, or service interruption resulting from the damage to the underground facility.

Paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) shall not apply to a person who commences excavation affecting an underground facility if the owner or operator of the underground facility has failed to comply with paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section or has failed to use reasonable care in the marking of the affected underground facility.

An action to recover a civil penalty under this section may be brought by an owner or operator, excavator, aggrieved party, district attorney, or the attorney general. Venue for such an action shall be proper in the district court for the county in which the owner or operator, excavator, or aggrieved party resides or maintains a principal place of business in this state or in the county in which the conduct giving rise to a civil penalty occurred.

Any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, including reasonable attorney fees, shall be paid to the prevailing party.

The penalties and remedies provided in this article 1.5 are in addition to any other remedy at law or equity available to an excavator or to the owner or operator of a damaged underground facility, and sections 9-1.5-104.2 and 9-1.5-104.4, regarding the safety commission's enforcement authority, do not limit or restrict any other remedy at law or equity available to an excavator or to the owner or operator of a damaged underground facility.

No civil penalty shall be imposed under this section against an excavator or owner or operator who violates any of the provisions of this section if the violation occurred while the excavator or owner or operator was responding to a service outage or other emergency; except that such penalty shall be imposed if such violation was willful or malicious.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to impose an indemnification obligation on any public entity or to alter the liability of public entities as provided in article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

In determining the liability for or the amount of any damages or civil penalty pursuant to this article, a court or arbitrator shall consider the nature, circumstances, and gravity of the alleged violation and the alleged violator's degree of culpability, history of prior violations, and level of cooperation with the requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 440, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 502, § 1, effective September 1; (2) amended, p. 502, § 1, effective January 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

Entire section R&RE, p. 688, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

IP(2)(d) amended, (HB 09-1092), ch. 38, p. 152, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(3)(c) amended, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1574, § 5, effective August 8.

9-1.5-104.7. Damage prevention fund.

The damage prevention fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of:

All receipts from money directed by law to be deposited to the fund;

All fines collected pursuant to section 9-1.5-104.4; and

Any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Only the safety commission may authorize expenditures from the fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the safety commission may use money deposited in the fund only to:

Develop and disseminate educational programming designed to improve worker and public safety relating to excavation and underground facilities; and

Provide grants to persons who have developed educational programming that the notification association and the safety commission deem appropriate for improving worker and public safety relating to excavation and underground facilities.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1568, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 9-1.5-108.

9-1.5-104.8. Safety commission fund.

The safety commission fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of:

All receipts from money directed by law to be deposited to the fund, including costs and fees awarded by a court pursuant to section 9-1.5-104.2 (9)(b); and

Any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Only the safety commission may authorize expenditures from the fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the safety commission may use money deposited in the fund only to pay for its expenses in administering this article 1.5.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1568, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 9-1.5-108.

9-1.5-105. Notification association - structure and funding requirements - duties of owners and operators - report.

There is hereby created a nonprofit corporation in the state of Colorado, referred to in this article 1.5 as the "notification association", which consists of all owners or operators of underground facilities. All owners and operators shall join the notification association and shall participate in a statewide program that utilizes a single, toll-free telephone number 811 that excavators can use to notify the notification association of pending excavation plans.

to (2.3) Repealed.

(2.4) Effective January 1, 2021, all underground facility owners and operators are members of the notification association. All members are full members of the notification association and are entitled to receive full service benefits as part of membership as specified in this article 1.5.

(2.5) The notification association may accept any organization, person, or entity which has an interest in the purposes and functions of the association as a member whether specifically enumerated in this article or not. Any such member shall comply with the bylaws of the association.

(2.6) (a) The notification association shall prepare annual reports on its activities, as follows:

A statistical summary of the information reported to it pursuant to section 9-1.5-103 (7)(b); and

An annual, independent financial audit of its operations.

The notification association shall provide a copy of both reports created under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.6) to its members and shall provide the report created under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.6) to the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado.

Repealed.

Effective January 1, 2021, each member of the notification association shall provide general information regarding all of the locations of any underground facilities that the member owns or operates, for excavation notification purposes only, and the member's contact information, both of which shall be updated annually, to the notification association, and the association shall maintain the information on file in a manner that ensures the confidentiality and security of the information.

Information regarding the location of underground facilities provided to the notification association by an owner or operator or to the safety commission by the notification association is exempt from the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, pursuant to section 24-72-204 (2)(a)(VIII)(A) regarding specialized details of critical infrastructure.

The notification association is governed by a board of directors, which must be representative of the membership of the association.
(4) (a) (I) The notification association is governed by a board of directors, which must be representative of the membership of the association.

Repealed.

The board of directors shall be elected by the membership of the association pursuant to the bylaws of the association.

The notification association shall be incorporated and operated as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S.

This section does not apply to:

Any owner or occupant of real property under which underground facilities are buried if the facilities are used solely to furnish service or commodities to the real property and no part of the facilities is located in a public street, county road, alley, or right-of-way dedicated to public use; or

Any homeowner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 522, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 93:

Entire article amended, p. 503, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 97:

(5) amended, p. 761, § 27, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

IP(2) amended and (2.6) R&RE, pp. 690, 691, §§ 5, 6, effective May 23.

L. 2018:

(1), IP(2), (3), (4), and (6) amended, (2.1) and (2.4) added, and (2.3) repealed, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1575, § 6, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsections (2.1)(a), (3)(a)(II), and (4)(a)(II)(B) provided for the repeal of subsections (2), (2.1), (3)(a), and (4)(a)(II), respectively, effective January 1, 2021. (See L. 2018, p. 1575.)

9-1.5-106. Notice requirements.

The notification association created in section 9-1.5-105 shall:

Receive and record notifications from excavators concerning intended excavation activities including sites, dates, and the nature of any intended excavation;

Maintain a record of each notice of intent to excavate for a minimum of three years; and

File the notification received regarding any proposed excavation site and the notification provided regarding such excavation site, including the date and time of each such notification, by reference number.

The notification association shall establish and maintain a damage prevention safety program and shall conduct periodic public awareness campaigns.

Repealed.

Effective January 1, 2021, the notification association shall provide prompt notice of any proposed excavation to each affected member that has any underground facilities in the area of the proposed excavation site.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended, p. 505, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1577, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(a)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3)(a), effective January 1, 2021. (See L. 2018, p. 1577.)

9-1.5-107. Notice of removal of underground facilities.

At least ten days before beginning an excavation to remove an underground facility that is a gas transmission pipeline that has been abandoned or is unused and is not located in a public road, street, alley, or right-of-way dedicated to public use, the excavator shall notify each owner of record and occupant of the real property where such underground facility is located. The notice shall state the commencement, extent, and duration of the excavation in addition to the information required by section 9-1.5-103 (3)(c) and shall be served in the same manner as personal service under the Colorado rules of civil procedure; except that, if such personal service cannot be made through the use of due diligence, notice may be served by mail to the owner's or occupant's last-known address. If a valid mailing address is not available through the use of due diligence, notice may be made by publication in a newspaper published in the county in which the property is located. For purposes of this section, an underground facility is not considered abandoned or unused if it is in operation for its intended purpose or is being actively maintained with reasonable anticipation of a future use.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 162, § 1, effective August 3.

9-1.5-108. Repeal - sunset review.

This section and sections 9-1.5-104.2, 9-1.5-104.4, 9-1.5-104.7, and 9-1.5-104.8 are repealed, effective September 1, 2028.

Before the repeal, the functions of the underground damage prevention safety commission related to underground facilities specified in sections 9-1.5-104.2, 9-1.5-104.4, 9-1.5-104.7, and 9-1.5-104.8 are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-167), ch. 256, p. 1577, § 8, effective August 8.